Wyoming, session 2025, HB0184.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 37-2-205 by creating a new subsection
(k) is amended to read:

37-2-205. Certificate of convenience and necessity;
hearings.

HB0184

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0648
(k) No person or entity shall sell electricity for
use by a customer in another public utility's certificated
service territory, including by providing service to a
point of delivery outside of the other public utility's
certificated territory for consumption within the other
public utility's certificated territory, without a customer
allocation agreement between the customer, the seller of
the electricity and the other public utility. Any violation
of this subsection shall entitle the aggrieved public
utility to recover in a civil action damages for lost
income from the unlawful invasion of its certificated
service territory, plus all reasonable attorney fees and
expenses incurred by the aggrieved public utility in the
civil action brought under this subsection.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0184